Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Dispensing with Administration

53-2-40.
Petition.

When an individual has died intestate and there has been no personal representative appointed in this state, any heir of the decedent may file a petition praying for an order that no administration is necessary. The petition shall be filed in the probate court of the county of the domicile of the decedent, if the decedent was domiciled in this state, or in the county in which real property is located, if the decedent was not domiciled in this state.

The petition shall show: the name and domicile of the decedent; the names, ages or majority status, and domicile of the heirs of the decedent; a description of the property in this state owned by the decedent; that the estate owes no debts or that there are known debts and all creditors have consented or will be served as provided in Chapter 11 of this title; and that the heirs have agreed upon a division of the estate among themselves. The agreement containing original signatures of all the heirs, attested to by a clerk of the probate court or a notary public, shall be attached to the petition. Property subject to an outstanding security deed or agreement may be subject to this proceeding only if the holder of the security deed consents or is served and makes no objection.

The personal representative of a deceased heir is authorized to agree to the division on behalf of that heir.

In any case involving the approval of a petition for an order that no administration is necessary, where there is an interest in real property, the court shall file, within 30 days of granting such petition, a certified copy of the order granting the petition that no administration is necessary in each county in this state in which the deceased owned real property, to be recorded in the deed records of the county and indexed under the name of the deceased in the grantor index. Such order shall be accompanied by the same fee for filing deeds with the clerk of the superior court. The filing fee and any fee for the recording of such order shall be taxed as costs to the estate. The certified copy of the order granting the petition that no administration is necessary shall set forth:

The date of the order granting such petition;

The name and address of the deceased;

The interest in the property acquired by each party; and

The name and address of all parties that take title to the real property pursuant to the order issued by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 10; Ga. L. 2008, p. 715, § 8/SB 508.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-2-41.
Issuance of citation and order; objections.

Upon the filing of a petition that states that there are known creditors of the estate who are to be served, a citation shall be issued and any creditors of the estate shall be served as provided in Chapter 11 of this title.

If any creditor, whether the debt is due or not, objects to the granting of the order, the court shall refuse to grant an order finding that no administration is necessary so long as such objection is not withdrawn.

In the event no creditor files objection to the granting of the order or if all objections are withdrawn, the probate court shall ascertain the heirs of the decedent and whether they are all of age and suffering under no disability or are represented by a guardian or a personal representative. If the court finds that all the heirs have consented and that the estate of the decedent owes no debts or that all creditors have consented or withdrawn any objection, the court shall then enter an order in the proceedings finding that no administration is necessary. Should property described in the petition be located in a county other than the county in which the petition is filed, a certified copy of the proceedings, including any agreement filed pursuant to Code Section 53-2-40, and the order of the probate court thereon may be entered in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property is located.

An order finding that no administration is necessary shall confirm the vesting of title to the decedent’s property in the heirs in the amounts and portions described in Code Section 53-2-1, or, if different, in the agreement filed by the heirs in accordance with Code Section 53-2-40.

Property thereafter sold or encumbered by the heirs of the decedent to a purchaser or lender who acts in good faith reliance upon the order shall be discharged from all claims and rights of the creditors of the deceased owner, except such claims, liens, judgments, security deeds, mortgages, or encumbrances as have been filed for record in the manner required by law so as to constitute notice thereof at the time of such sale or encumbrance by the heirs.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to apply to or adversely affect liens for taxes or liens arising from the giving or signing of the bond of a public official.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

53-2-42.
Right of action by creditor.

After the granting of an order by the probate court that no administration is necessary, any creditor of the decedent shall have a right of action on the unsatisfied debts against the heirs, to the extent of the value of property received by the heirs.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.